District of Columbia statutes.
8-1806

Release to owner.

(a)

The Mayor shall not release a dog to its owner unless the owner has obtained a license as provided in § 8-1804.

(b)

An owner of an animal that is impounded shall pay the following:

(1)

An impoundment fee of $15 for animals certified by a licensed veterinarian as either spayed or neutered or incapable of enduring spaying or neutering;

(2)

An impoundment fee of $15 for unneutered and unspayed animals, provided the owner agrees to have the animal sterilized and prepays the cost of the surgery;

(3)

An impoundment fee of $75 for dogs and $50 for all other animals that have not been spayed or neutered, where the owner does not utilize the option in paragraph (2) of this subsection;

(4)

A boarding fee of $5 for each night after the 1st night;

(5)

The cost of veterinary services, including vaccinations, provided by the Mayor; and

(6)

Any outstanding fines.

(c)

The Mayor shall issue a notice of violation to an owner of an animal impounded under § 8-1805 except that this subsection shall not apply the 1st time an owner has an animal impounded.

Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-30, § 7, 26 DCR 765
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-236, § 2(c), 40 DCR 614

History

1981 Ed., § 6-1006.
1973 Ed., § 6-2406.

Prior Codifications